Wyoming, session 2026, HB0003.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1.
(a) The legislature finds that:
(i) Pregnancy centers have a considerable and
growing life-affirming impact on the people and communities
that they serve;
(ii) Pregnancy centers serve people in Wyoming
and across the United States with integrity and compassion;
(iii) Pregnancy centers provide comprehensive
care to people facing unexpected pregnancies, including
resources to meet their physical, psychological, emotional
and spiritual needs;
(iv) Pregnancy centers offer women free,
confidential and compassionate services, including
pregnancy tests, peer counseling, twenty-four (24) hour
telephone hotlines, childbirth and parenting classes,
referrals to community health care, adoption referrals and
other support services;
(v) Many medical pregnancy centers offer
ultrasounds and other medical services;
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0003
ENROLLED ACT NO. 22, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(vi) Pregnancy centers encourage women to make
positive life choices by equipping them with complete and
accurate information regarding their pregnancy options and
the development of their unborn children;
(vii) Pregnancy centers provide important
support and resources for women who choose childbirth over
abortion;
(viii) Pregnancy centers have faced
unprecedented attacks since the United States Supreme
Court's decision in Dobbs v. Jackson Women's Health
Organization, which overturned Roe v. Wade and the federal
constitutional right to abortion;
(ix) Since 2022, at least one-third (1/3) of the
states have introduced legislation seeking to undermine
pregnancy centers' freedom of speech and association, or
legislation to interfere with their hiring and staffing
decisions, while numerous municipalities have considered
similar ordinances.
Section 2. W.S. 35-4-1101 through 35-4-1104 are
created to read:
ARTICLE 11
PREGNANCY CENTERS – PROTECTION
35-4-1101. Short title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Wyoming
Pregnancy Center Autonomy and Rights of Expression (CARE)
Act."
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0003
ENROLLED ACT NO. 22, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
35-4-1102. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act:
(i) "Abortion" means the act of using or
prescribing any instrument, medicine, drug or any other
substance, device or means with the intent to terminate the
clinically diagnosable pregnancy of a woman and for the
purpose of ensuring the death of the unborn child.
"Abortion" shall not include any use, prescription or means
specified in this paragraph if the use, prescription or
means are done with the intent to:
(A) Save the life or preserve the health of
the unborn child;
(B) Remove a dead unborn child caused by
miscarriage or stillbirth;
(C) Remove an ectopic pregnancy; or
(D) Perform a procedure, based on
reasonable medical judgment, that is necessary to save the
life of or prevent serious physical injury to the pregnant
woman.
(ii) "Abortion-inducing drug" means any
medicine, drug or any other substance prescribed or
dispensed with the intent of terminating the clinically
diagnosable pregnancy of a woman and for the purpose of
ensuring the death of an unborn child. "Abortion-inducing
drug" includes the off-label use of any substance intended
to induce an abortion. "Abortion-inducing drug" does not
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0003
ENROLLED ACT NO. 22, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
include drugs that may be known to cause an abortion but
are prescribed for other medical indications;
(iii) "Contraception" means the use of any
natural or artificial means to prevent the fertilization of
a human ovum;
(iv) "Ectopic pregnancy" means the state of
carrying an unborn child outside of the uterine cavity;
(v) "Miscarriage" or "stillbirth" means a
spontaneous loss of an unborn child;
(vi) "Pregnancy center" means a private
nonprofit organization that promotes childbirth and
alternatives to abortion and provides people with
resources, counseling, classes, referrals and information
related to pregnancy, childbearing, adoption and parenting.
A medical pregnancy center may provide medical testing,
counseling and pregnancy-related care;
(vii) "This act" means W.S. 35-4-1101 through
35-4-1104.
35-4-1103. Interference with pregnancy centers
prohibited.
(a) The state and any of its political subdivisions,
counties, cities, towns, special districts and agencies
shall not, through the adoption or enactment of any law,
ordinance, resolution, policy or similar measure:
(i) Require a pregnancy center to offer or
perform abortions;
4

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0003
ENROLLED ACT NO. 22, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(ii) Require a pregnancy center to offer,
provide or distribute abortion-inducing drugs or
contraception;
(iii) Require a pregnancy center to refer any
person for abortion, an abortion-inducing drug or
contraception;
(iv) Require a pregnancy center to counsel in
favor of abortion, abortion-inducing drugs or
contraception;
(v) Require a pregnancy center to post any
advertisement, sign, flyer or other similar material that
promotes or provides any information about obtaining an
abortion, abortion-inducing drugs or contraception;
(vi) Prohibit a pregnancy center from providing
information, care, counseling, classes or other services
related to pregnancy, childbirth or parenting because the
pregnancy center does not perform, refer or counsel in
favor of abortion, abortion-inducing drugs or
contraception;
(vii) Prohibit a pregnancy center from providing
prenatal and postnatal resources, including diapers, baby
clothes, baby furniture, formula and similar items because
the pregnancy center does not perform, refer or counsel in
favor of abortion, abortion-inducing drugs or
contraception;
(viii) Prohibit a medical pregnancy center from
providing medical testing, counseling and care related to
pregnancy or childbirth because the pregnancy center does
5

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0003
ENROLLED ACT NO. 22, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
not perform, refer or counsel in favor of abortion,
abortion-inducing drugs or contraception;
(ix) Prohibit a medical pregnancy center from
counseling a woman on any pregnancy-related care or
treatment, including care or treatment that may reverse the
effects of abortion-inducing drugs;
(x) Interfere with the pregnancy center's
staffing or hiring decisions by requiring the center to
interview, hire or continue to employ any person who does
not affirm the center's mission statement or agree to
comply with the center's pro-life ethic and operating
procedure.
35-4-1104. Legal remedies.
(a) A pregnancy center or any person aggrieved by a
violation of this act may commence a civil action for
injunctive, equitable or declaratory relief permitted by
law. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit
any other remedies that may be available under any other
federal, state or municipal law.
6

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0003
ENROLLED ACT NO. 22, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
7